Utah statutes.
76-5-102.3.   Assault against school employees.
(1)  Any person who assaults an employee of a public or private school, with
knowledge that the individual is an employee, and when the employee is acting
within the scope of his authority as an employee, is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
(2)  As used in this section, "employee" includes a volunteer.
